Illinois, session 104th, HB3762.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Workplace Extreme Temperature Safety Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds and 7declares:8    (a) As the frequency of extreme weather events continues 9to grow, workers are at an increased risk of serious injury or 10death. Heat stress or cold stress can occur at temperatures as 11low as 40 degrees Fahrenheit or as high as 78 degrees 12Fahrenheit, depending on the working conditions. Unaddressed, 13heat stress and cold stress can cause a range of serious 14conditions, including stroke and death if not treated 15properly. Heat related injuries and fatalities may be 16underreported as heat stress exacerbates existing health 17problems like asthma, kidney failure, and heart disease, 18leading to potential comorbidities being reported. Workers in 19agriculture and construction are at the highest risk of 20weather-related injuries, but the problem affects all workers 21exposed to extreme temperatures, including indoor workers 22without adequately climate-controlled environments or 23appropriate personal protective equipment.  HB3762- 2 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1    (b) From 1979 to 2022, more than 14,000 Americans have 2died directly from heat-related causes, according to the 3United States Environmental Protection Agency.4    (c) In the absence of a temperature stress standard 5adopted by the Occupational Health and Safety Administration, 6the Department of Labor should adopt a heat stress standard 7for the protection of employees against temperature-related 8hazards, illness, and injury that effects employers and 9employees in this State in private and public employment. 10    Section 10. Definitions.11    "Acclimatization" means the body's temporary adaptation to 12work in heat that occurs as a person is exposed to extreme 13temperature over a period of 7 to 14 days depending on the 14amount of recent work in excessive heat and the individual 15factors. "Acclimatization" may be lost after 7 consecutive 16days away from working in the heat.17    "Cold-related illness" means a medical condition resulting 18from the body losing heat faster than it can produce heat 19creating a risk of severe injury, illness, or death.20    "Cold stress" means the net load to which a worker is 21exposed from the combined contributions of metabolic heat, 22environmental factors, including temperature, wind chill, and 23moisture, and personal protective equipment worn that results 24in a loss of heat to the body, causing body temperature to 25drop.  HB3762- 3 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1    "Director" means the Director of Labor, or the Director's 2designee.3    "Department" means the Department of Labor.4    "Engineering controls" means the use of devices to reduce 5exposure to extreme temperatures. "Engineering controls" 6includes fans, heating stations, misting stations, and air 7conditioning. "Engineering controls" does not include wearable 8items. 9    "Employ" means to suffer or to permit to work.10    "Employee" means any individual employed by an employer.11    "Employer" means any individual, partnership, association, 12corporation, and the State and any county and municipality, 13and school district, agency, authority, department, bureau, or 14instrumentality thereof, acting directly or indirectly in the 15interest of an employer in relation to an employee.16    "Excessive cold" means levels of outdoor or indoor 17exposure to cold that exceed the capacities of the human body 18to maintain normal body functions.19    "Heat-related illness" means a medical condition resulting 20from the inability of the body to manage excess heat, 21including heat rash, heat cramps, heat exhaustion, heat 22syncope, and heat stroke.23    "Excessive heat" means levels of outdoor or indoor 24exposure to heat that exceed the capacities of the human body 25to maintain normal body functions.26    "Heat stress" means the net load to which a worker is   HB3762- 4 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1exposed from the combined contributions of metabolic heat, 2environmental factors, and clothing worn which result in an 3increase in heat storage in the body, causing body temperature 4to rise to sometimes dangerous levels.5    "Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, 6business, industry or branch or group of industries or 7employment or class of employment in which employees are 8employed.9    "Occupational safety and health standard" means a rule 10that requires the following: a condition that is reasonably 11appropriate or necessary to make employment and places of 12employment safe and healthful; or the adoption or use of a 13means, method, operation, practice, or process that is 14reasonably appropriate or necessary to make employment and 15places of employment safe and healthful. 16    Section 15. Establishment of excessive heat and cold 17standards.18    (a) The Director shall adopt rules to establish excessive 19heat standards. Until rules are adopted under this Section, 20excessive heat standards are as follows:21        (1) for an outdoor place of employment, the heat index 22    equals or exceeds 80 degrees Fahrenheit;23        (2) for an indoor place of employment:24            (A) the temperature equals or exceeds 80 degrees 25        Fahrenheit and the heat index equals or exceeds 85   HB3762- 5 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1        degrees Fahrenheit;2            (B) if employees wear clothing that restricts heat 3        removal, the temperature equals or exceeds 80 degrees 4        Fahrenheit; and5            (C) if employees work in a high radiant heat area, 6        the temperature equals or exceeds 80 degrees 7        Fahrenheit.8    For indoor and outdoor places of employment, if the heat 9index equals or exceeds 90 degrees Fahrenheit, employers shall 10implement additional workplace safety standards, including the 11possible utilization of personal protective equipment.12    (b) The Director shall adopt rules to establish excessive 13heat standards. Until rules are adopted under this Section, 14excessive heat standards are as follows:15        (1) for an outdoor place of employment, the wind chill 16    is equal or below 40 degrees Fahrenheit; 17        (2) for an indoor place of employment where heavy work 18    is performed, unless prohibited by process requirements, 19    the temperature is equal or below 60 degrees Fahrenheit; 20    and21        (3) for an indoor place of employment where light work 22    is performed, unless prohibited by process requirements, a 23    temperature is equal or below 65 degrees Fahrenheit.24    (c) Any temperature, heat index, or wind chill described 25in this Section shall be based on a measurement of the National 26Weather Service.   HB3762- 6 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1    Section 20. Occupational temperature-related illness and 2injury prevention plan.3    (a) On or before January 1, 2026, the Director shall 4establish by rule an occupational temperature-related illness 5and injury prevention plan that contains the following:6        (1) a standard that establishes temperature hazard 7    levels for employees that, if exceeded, trigger actions by 8    employers to protect employees from temperature-related 9    illness and injury; and10        (2) a requirement that each employer develop, 11    implement, and maintain a plan to effectively prevent 12    temperature-related illness and injury for its employees.13    (b) The occupational temperature-related illness and 14injury prevention plan shall, to the extent permitted by 15federal law, be developed and implemented with the 16participation of employees and employee representatives, 17including collective bargaining representatives. The plan 18shall be tailored and specific to the hazards in a place of 19employment. The plan shall be in writing in both English and in 20the language that each employee understands, if that language 21is not English. The plan shall be provided to the Director, 22employees, and any employee representatives, including 23collective bargaining representatives, on the last business 24day of May each year and shall be made available at other times 25of the year upon written request. The Director shall develop a   HB3762- 7 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1model occupational temperature-related illness and injury 2prevention plan, consistent with the provisions of this Act, 3that includes, but is not limited to:4        (1) model training for employees and supervisors; and5        (2) tailored to the specific hazards in places of 6    employment with high risks of exposure to heat and cold. 7    An employer may adopt the Director's model occupational 8temperature-related illness and injury prevention plan, modify 9that model plan, or develop their own occupational 10temperature-related illness and injury prevention plan, 11consistent with the provisions of this Act, including the 12employee participation requirements.13    (c) The occupational temperature-related illness and 14injury prevention plan described in subsection (a) shall, at a 15minimum, contain procedures and methods for the following: 16        (1) regular monitoring for employee exposure to heat 17    or cold to determine whether an employee's exposure has 18    been excessive;19        (2) providing potable water, available immediately and 20    in immediate and safe proximity to heat impacted 21    employees;22        (3) providing heat-impacted employees with paid rest 23    breaks and access to shade, cool-down areas or 24    climate-controlled spaces; 25        (4) providing warm, non-caffeinated beverages in 26    immediate and safe proximity to cold impacted employees;   HB3762- 8 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1        (5) providing cold impacted employees with paid rest 2    breaks and access to warming stations sheltered from the 3    wind and any precipitation;4        (6) providing an emergency response for any employee 5    who has suffered injury as a result of being exposed to 6    excessive heat or cold;7        (7) limiting the length of time an employee may be 8    exposed to heat or cold during the workday;9        (8) establishing guidelines for the usage of heat 10    insulating personal protection equipment for workers 11    exposed to temperatures below 65 degrees Fahrenheit for 12    light activity and 60 degrees Fahrenheit for moderate to 13    heavy activity;14        (9) establishing a worker acclimatization policy 15    conforming with the recommended alert limits as 16    established by the "Occupational Exposure to Heat and Hot 17    Environments" published in 2016 by the Department of 18    Health and Human Services;19        (10) for outdoor and indoor non-climate-controlled 20    environments, implementing a heat and cold alert system to 21    provide notification to employees when the National 22    Weather Service forecasts that excessive heat or excessive 23    cold is likely to occur in the following day or days in a 24    locality where an employer has employees in that State, 25    and when that notification occurs, including:26            (A) postponing tasks that are non-essential until   HB3762- 9 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1        the excessive temperature condition subsides;2            (B) instituting or increasing rest allowances;3            (C) reminding workers to drink liquids in small 4        amounts frequently to prevent dehydration; and5            (D) to the extent practicable, monitoring the 6        environmental heat index at job sites and resting 7        places;8        (11) preventing hazards, including through the use of:9            (A) engineering controls that include the 10        isolation of hot or cold processes, the isolation of 11        employees from sources of heat or cold, local exhaust 12        ventilation, shielding from a radiant heat source or 13        freezers, the insulation of hot surfaces, air 14        conditioning, cooling fans, evaporative coolers, and 15        natural ventilation;16            (B) administrative controls that limit exposure to 17        a hazard by adjustment of work procedures or work 18        schedules, including rotating employees, scheduling 19        work earlier or later in the day, using work-rest 20        schedules, reducing work intensity or speed, and 21        changing required work clothing;22            (C) personal protective equipment, including 23        water-cooled garments, heated garments, air-cooled 24        garments, reflective clothing, and cooling and heating 25        vests; and26            (D) administrative controls on routine temperature   HB3762- 10 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1        variation of more than 50 degrees Fahrenheit between 2        work spaces;3        (12) coordinating risk assessment efforts, plan 4    development, and implementation with other employers who 5    have employees who work at the same work site; and6        (13) allowing employees to contact the employer 7    directly and efficiently to communicate if the employee 8    feels like the employee is suffering from an extreme 9    temperature-related illness.10    (d) The occupational temperature-related illness and 11injury prevention plan shall contain, at a minimum, annual 12training and education, including training and education 13regarding the following:14        (1) the identification of extreme temperature-related 15    illness risk factors;16        (2) personal factors that may increase susceptibility 17    to temperature-related illness;18        (3) signs and symptoms of temperature-related illness;19        (4) different types of temperature-related illness;20        (5) the importance of consuming fluids;21        (6) available engineering control measures;22        (7) administrative control measures;23        (8) the importance of reporting temperature-related 24    symptoms;25        (9) recordkeeping requirements and reporting 26    procedures;  HB3762- 11 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1        (10) emergency response procedures; and2        (11) rights under this Act.3    (e) The occupational temperature-related illness and 4injury prevention plan shall contain, at a minimum, special 5training and education to employees who are supervisors, in 6addition to the training and education provided to all 7employees under subsection (d), that shall include training 8and education containing the following:9        (1) procedures a supervisor shall follow with respect 10    to the prevention of employee exposure to excessive 11    temperatures; 12        (2) how to recognize high-risk situations, including 13    how to monitor weather reports and weather advisories, the 14    risk of assigning an employee to a situation that could 15    predictably compromise the safety of the employee, and 16    initially and regularly monitor for employee exposure to 17    heat or cold to determine whether an employee's exposure 18    has been excessive; and 19        (3) emergency response procedures if an employee 20    exhibits signs or reports symptoms consistent with 21    temperature-related illnesses.22    (f) The occupational temperature-related illness and 23injury prevention plan shall require that the education and 24training:25        (1) be provided by an employer for each new employee 26    before starting a job assignment;  HB3762- 12 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1        (2) provide employees opportunities to ask questions, 2    provide feedback, and request additional instruction, 3    clarification, or follow-up;4        (3) be provided by an individual with knowledge of 5    temperature-related illness prevention and the plan of the 6    employer; and 7        (4) be appropriate in content and commensurate to the 8    language, education level, and literacy of each employee.9    (g) An employer shall maintain the following:10        (1) records related to the heat-related illness and 11    injury prevention plan, including heat-related illness 12    risk and hazard assessments and identification, 13    evaluation, correction and training procedures;14        (2) data on all heat-related illnesses, injuries, and 15    fatalities that have occurred at the place of employment, 16    including, but not limited to, the type of heat-related 17    illness or injury experienced and symptoms experienced, 18    the cause of death, the time at which manifestation of 19    illness, injury, or death occurred, environmental 20    measures, including temperature and humidity levels, at 21    time of manifestation of illness, injury or death, a 22    description of the location where the manifestation of 23    illness, injury, or death occurred; and24        (3) data concerning environmental and physiological 25    measurements related to heat.26    (h) An employer shall make the records and data available,   HB3762- 13 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1on request, for examination and copying at no cost, to an 2employee, an employee's authorized representatives, including 3collective bargaining representatives, and to the Director. 4The employer shall preserve the records and data for a minimum 5of 3 years.6    (i) Employers shall comply with the provisions of the heat 7stress and cold stress standards in accordance with this 8section 60 days after the rules containing the heat stress 9standard are adopted.10    (k) this Act shall not apply to any employees directly 11involved in the protection of life or property, including, but 12not limited to, lifeguards, firefighters, paramedics, law 13enforcement personnel, and employees engaged in the emergency 14restoration of essential infrastructure and services, 15including roads, bridges, utilities, and communications.16    (l) After an employer has implemented an occupational 17temperature-related illness and injury prevention plan each 18employer shall, annually, on or before the first business day 19of May, review, release, and give notice to employees and any 20authorized representatives of their employees, including their 21collective bargaining representatives, an updated copy of the 22employer's temperature-related illness and injury prevention 23plan. 24    Section 25. Retaliation.25    (a) It is a violation of this Act for an employer to   HB3762- 14 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1retaliate through termination of employment, discipline, or 2taking any other adverse action against any employee for 3exercising any right under this Act. There shall be a 4rebuttable presumption of unlawful retaliation under this 5Section if an employer takes an adverse action against an 6employee within 90 days after the employee exercises the 7employee's rights under this Act.8    (b) It is a violation of this Act for an employer to 9retaliate or take adverse action against an employee if the 10employee:11        (1) makes a complaint to an employer, to a co-worker, 12    to a community organization, before a public hearing, or 13    to a State or federal agency that rights under this Act 14    have been violated;15        (2) seeks assistance or intervention with respect to 16    heat-related health symptoms from, the employer, local 17    emergency services, the federal government, the State, or 18    a local government;19        (3) refuses to work if the employee reasonably 20    believes:21            (A) that an employer has not met the minimum 22        requirements under this Act to prevent illness and 23        injury; or24            (B) that performing the required work in extreme 25        temperature conditions may result in illness or 26        injury;  HB3762- 15 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1        (4) institutes any proceeding under or related to this 2    Act; or 3        (5) testifies or prepares to testify in an 4    investigation or proceeding under this Act. 5    Section 30. Violations. The Department, or the Attorney 6General pursuant to its authority under Section 6.3 of the 7Attorney General Act, shall have the authority to issue a 8temporary emergency cease and desist order to halt any conduct 9of the employer that is warranted by public health and safety 10concerns or is in violation of this Act. The Attorney General 11shall seek a court order extending any emergency cease and 12desist order to halt any conduct of the employer that is 13warranted by public health and safety concerns is in this Act 14as soon as practicable. Before issuing a cease and desist 15order authorized under this Section, the Attorney General 16shall provide notice to the Director. 17    Section 35. Penalties. An employer who violates any 18provision of this Act or any rule adopted under this Act shall 19be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $100 and not 20more than $5,000 for each violation found in an initial 21investigation by the Department or determined by a court in a 22civil action brought by an interested party, or determined by 23a court in a civil action brought by the Attorney General 24pursuant to its authority under Section 6.3 of the Attorney   HB3762- 16 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1General Act. An employer found to have committed any repeat 2violation of this Act by the Department or circuit court 3within 3 years following the first finding shall be subject to 4a civil penalty of not less than $250 and not more than $15,000 5for each such repeat violation. For purposes of this Section, 6each violation of this Act for each employee and for each day 7the violation continues shall constitute a separate and 8distinct violation. Any penalty assessed under this Act 9against a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, 10or sole proprietorship, shall be effective against any 11successor entity that is engaged in the same or equivalent 12trade or activity, and has one or more of the same principals 13or officers, as the corporation, partnership, limited 14liability company, or sole proprietorship against which the 15penalty was assessed. In determining the appropriateness of a 16penalty to the employer, the Director or circuit court shall 17consider the factors including, the history of violations by 18the employer, the seriousness of the violation, the good faith 19of the employer, and the size of the employer's business. The 20amount of the penalty may be: (1) recovered in a civil action 21brought by the Director in any circuit court, represented by 22the Attorney General; or (2) ordered by the court, in an action 23brought by any party, including the Attorney General for a 24violation of this Act. 25    Section 40. Enforcement by the Department.  HB3762- 17 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1    (a) The Department shall enforce the provisions of this 2Act when, in the Department's judgment, there is cause and 3sufficient resources for investigation. The Department shall 4have the authority to conduct investigations in connection 5with the administration and enforcement of this Act. The 6Director, or the Director's designee, may:7        (1) enter and inspect the place of business if any 8    employer for the purpose of examining and inspecting the 9    physical workplace;10        (2) inspect or copy any records of the employer that 11    relate in any way to or have a bearing upon the question of 12    compliance with this Act;13        (3) question any employee outside the presence of the 14    employer or any employer representative;15        (4) conduct any tests at the employer's place of 16    business to determine if this Act has been violated; and17        (5) require any employer to submit written statements, 18    including sworn statements, relating to compliance with 19    this Act as the Director may deem necessary or 20    appropriate.21    (b) A representative of the employer and a representative 22of the employees shall be given an opportunity to accompany 23the Department during the physical inspection of any workplace 24for the purpose of aiding the inspection.25        (1) The Department may permit additional 26    representatives of the employer and representatives of the   HB3762- 18 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1    employees to be present during the inspection if the 2    Department determines that the additional representatives 3    will aid the inspection. A different employer and employee 4    representative may be present during each phase of the 5    inspection if doing so does not interfere with the 6    inspection.7        (2) The Department shall have authority to resolve all 8    disputes as to who shall be the representative of the 9    employer and the representative of the employees. If there 10    is no authorized representative of employees, or if the 11    Department is unable to determine with reasonable 12    certainty who is the representative, the Department shall 13    consult with a reasonable number of employees concerning 14    matters of safety and health in the workplace.15        (3) The representative of the employees may be an 16    employee of the employer or a third party. When the 17    representative of the employees is not an employee of the 18    same employer, the representative of the employees may be 19    present during the inspection if, in the judgment of the 20    Department, good cause has been shown why a third party is 21    reasonably necessary to the conduct of an effective and 22    thorough physical inspection of the workplace.23        (4) The Department is authorized to deny the right to 24    be present during an inspection for any person whose 25    conduct interferes with a fair and orderly inspection.26    (c) The Director may compel, by subpoena, the attendance   HB3762- 19 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1and testimony of witnesses and the production of books, 2payrolls, records, papers, and other evidence in any 3investigation or hearing and may administer oaths to 4witnesses.5    (d) The Department shall conduct hearings in accordance 6with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act upon written 7complaint by an investigator of the Department or any 8interested person of a violation of this Act. After the 9hearing, if supported by the evidence, the Department may:10        (1) issue and cause to be served on any party an order 11    to cease and desist from further violation of this Act;12        (2) take affirmative or other action as deemed 13    reasonable to eliminate the effect of the violation; and14        (3) determine the amount of any civil penalty allowed 15    by this Act. 16    Section 45. Review under Administrative Review Law. Any 17party to a proceeding under this Act may apply for and obtain 18judicial review of an order of the Department entered under 19this Act in accordance with the provisions of the 20Administrative Review Law, and the Department in proceedings 21under this Act may obtain an order from the court for the 22enforcement of its order. 23    Section 50. Contempt. If it appears that an employer 24covered by this Act has violated a valid order of the   HB3762- 20 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1Department issued under this Act, the Director may commence an 2action and obtain from the court an order commanding the 3employer to obey the order of the Department or be adjudged 4guilty of contempt of court and punished accordingly. 5    Section 55. Action for civil enforcement by an interested 6party.7    (a) Upon a reasonable belief that an employer covered by 8this Act is in violation of any part of this Act, an interested 9party may initiate a civil action in the county where the 10alleged offenses occurred or where any party to this Action 11resides, asserting that a violation of this Act has occurred, 12pursuant to the following sequence of events:13        (1) The interested party submits to the Department a 14    complaint describing the violation and naming the employer 15    alleged to have violated this Act.16        (2) The Department sends notice of complaint to the 17    named parties alleged to have violated this Act and the 18    interested party.19        (3) The named party may either contest the alleged 20    violation or attempt to cure the alleged violation within 21    30 days after the receipt of the notice of complaint or, if 22    the named party does not respond within 30 days, the 23    Department issues a notice of right to sue to the 24    interested party as described in paragraph (4).25        (4) The Department issues a notice of right to sue to   HB3762- 21 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1    the interested party, if one or more of the following has 2    occurred:3            (A) the named party has cured the alleged 4        violation to the satisfaction of the Director;5            (B) the Director has determined that the 6        allegation is unjustified or that the Department does 7        not have jurisdiction over the matter or the parties; 8        or9            (C) the Director has determined that the 10        allegation is justified or has not made a 11        determination, and either has decided not to exercise 12        jurisdiction over the matter or has concluded 13        administrative enforcement of the matter.14    (b) If within 180 days after service of the notice of 15complaint to the parties, the Department has not (i) resolved 16the contest and cure period, (ii) with the mutual agreement of 17the parties, extended the time for the named party to cure the 18violation and resolve the complaint, or (iii) issued a right 19to sue letter, the interested party may initiate a civil 20action for penalties. The parties may extend the 180-day 21period by mutual agreement. The limitations period for the 22interested party to bring an action for the alleged violation 23of the Act shall be tolled for the 180-day period and for the 24period of any mutually agreed extensions. At the end of the 25180-day period, or any mutually agreed extensions, the 26Department shall issue a right to sue letter to the interested   HB3762- 22 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1party.2    (c) Upon receipt of a right to sue letter from the 3Department, an interested party may bring a civil action in 4the county where the alleged offenses occurred or where any 5party to this Action resides, in the name of the State or for 6the benefit of any impacted employee. If this Action is 7brought in the name of the State:8        (1) No later than 30 days after filing an action, the 9    interested party shall serve upon the State through the 10    Attorney General a copy of the complaint and written 11    disclosure of substantially all material evidence and 12    information the interested party possesses.13        (2) The State may elect to intervene and proceed with 14    the action no later than 60 days after it receives both the 15    complaint and the material evidence and information. The 16    State may, for good cause shown, move the court for an 17    extension of the time to intervene and proceed with the 18    action.19        (3) Before the expiration of the 60-day period or any 20    extensions under subparagraph (2), the State shall:21            (A) proceed with the action, in which case the 22        action shall be conducted by the State; or23            (B) notify the court that it declines to take the 24        action, in which case the interested party bringing 25        the action shall have the right to conduct the action.26        (4) When the State conducts the action, the interested   HB3762- 23 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1    party shall have the right to continue as a party to the 2    action subject to the following limitations:3            (A) the State may dismiss the action 4        notwithstanding the objections of the interested party 5        initiating the action if the interested party has been 6        notified by the State of the filing of the motion and 7        the court has provided the interested party with an 8        opportunity for a hearing on the motion; and9            (B) the State may settle the action with the 10        defendant notwithstanding the objections of the person 11        initiating the action if the court determines, after a 12        hearing, that the proposed settlement is fair, 13        adequate, and reasonable under all the circumstances.14        (5) If an interested party brings an action under this 15    Section, no person other than the State may intervene or 16    bring a related action on behalf of the State based on the 17    facts underlying the pending action.18        (6) An action brought in court by an interested party 19    under this Section may be dismissed if the court and the 20    Attorney General give written consent to the dismissal and 21    their reasons for consenting.22    (d) Any claim or action filed by an interested party under 23this Section shall be made no later 3 years after the alleged 24conduct resulting in the complaint, plus any period for which 25the limitations period has been tolled.26    (e) In an action brought by an interested party under this   HB3762- 24 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1Section, an interested party may recover against the covered 2entity any statutory penalties set forth in Section 70, 3injunctive relief, and any other relief available to the 4Department. An interested party who prevails in a civil action 5shall receive 10% of any statutory penalties assessed, plus 6any attorney's fees and costs. The remaining 90% of any 7statutory penalties assessed shall be deposited into a special 8fund of the Department for enforcement of this Act. 9    Section 60. Private right of action.10    (a) An employee aggrieved by any violation of this Act or 11any rule adopted under this Act may file suit in circuit court, 12in the county where the alleged offense occurred or where any 13employee who is party to this Action resides, without regard 14to exhaustion of any alternative administrative remedies 15provided in this Act. Actions may be brought by one or more 16employees for and on behalf of themselves and other employees 17similarly situated. An employee whose rights have been 18violated under this Act by an employer is entitled to collect:19        (1) in the case of a notice violation, statutory 20    damages in an amount of not less than $50 and not more than 21    $500 for the violation of each subpart of each section of 22    this Act;23        (2) in the case of a health and safety violation, in 24    addition to all other relief available for injury, 25    compensatory damages and an amount of statutory damages of   HB3762- 25 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1    not less than $50 and not more than $500 for each violation 2    of this Act;3        (3) in the case of unlawful retaliation, all relief 4    necessary to make the employee whole, including but not 5    limited to:6            (A) permanent or preliminary injunctive relief;7            (B) reinstatement with the same seniority status 8        that the employee would have had, but for the 9        violation;10            (C) back pay, with interest of 9% per annum for no 11        more than 90 calendar days from the date the complaint 12        is filed and front pay;13            (D) liquidated damages of up to $10,000;14            (E) compensation for any costs incurred as a 15        result of the violation, including litigation costs, 16        expert witness fees, and reasonable attorney's fees; 17        and18            (F) a civil penalty of $10,000, payable to the 19        employee.20    (b) The right of an aggrieved employee to bring an action 21under this Section terminates upon the passing of 3 years 22after the date of the violation. This limitations period is 23tolled if an employer or prospective employer has failed to 24provide an employee or prospective employer information 25required under this Act or has deterred an employee or 26prospective employee from the exercise of rights under this   HB3762- 26 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1Act.2    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit in 3any way an employee's rights to bring an action for injury 4through a tort action, workers compensation, union grievance 5procedure or any other legal avenue available to an employee. 6    Section 65. No diminution of obligations.7    (a) No provision of this Act or any rules adopted under 8this Act shall be construed as:9        (1) requiring an employer to diminish or reduce 10    protections provided by the employer under an employer 11    policy or collective bargaining agreement that are more 12    favorable to employee safety than the protections required 13    by this Act or that provide rights or benefits to 14    employees not provided by this Act;15        (2) prohibiting an employer from agreeing to provide 16    protections under an employer policy or collective 17    bargaining agreement that are more favorable to employees 18    than the protections required by this Act or to provide 19    rights or benefits to employees not provided by this Act; 20    or21        (3) superseding any law providing collective 22    bargaining rights for employees or in any way reducing, 23    diminishing, or adversely affecting those collective 24    bargaining rights or the obligations of employers under 25    any law.  HB3762- 27 -LRB104 12261 SPS 22373 b1    (b) To the extent any federal heat stress standard law, 2rule, or regulation is more favorable to employees than any 3requirement of this Act, the Director shall update the heat 4stress standard rule to align with the federal standard.